Tennessee, session 114, SB1717.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-113, is amended by deleting
subdivision (i)(1) and substituting:
(1) It is an offense to knowingly violate:
(A) A no contact order, issued prior to a defendant's release on bond,
following the defendant's arrest for any criminal offense defined in this chapter in
which the alleged victim of the offense is a domestic abuse victim as defined in §
36-3-601; or
(B) A no contact order issued as part of a defendant's sentence or
conditions of probation or parole following conviction for any criminal offense
defined in this chapter in which the alleged victim of the offense is a domestic
abuse victim as defined in § 36-3-601.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-113(i)(2), is amended by
deleting "arrested" and substituting "arrested or convicted".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1717
010602
- 1 -